Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
CHIPS Child Care Work Group.  (1) The Oregon Business Development De-
partment shall establish the CHIPS Child Care Work Group to develop recommendations:
(a) To require financial contributions to the CHIPS Child Care Fund established  under
section 3 of this 2024 Act by businesses that receive a program grant  or loan under section
3, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, and  federal semiconductor financial assistance, as defined
in section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023.
(b) To determine the  monetary amount of financial contributions and the mechanism by
which those contributions are to be made under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The work group must include, at a minimum, representation of relevant  state agen-
cies, businesses described in subsection (1) of this section and child care advocates.
SECTION 2. Financial support for construction workforce.  (1) The Oregon Business De-
velopment Department shall enter into an interagency agreement  with the Bureau of Labor
and Industries to develop and administer a program to provide  financial support and child
care subsidies to:
(a) Apprentices who are participating in  a course of study in construction under ORS
660.002 to 660.210.
(b) Journeyworkers who have completed an apprenticeship in construction under ORS
660.002 to 660.210 within the last five years.
(2) Financial support  under subsection (1) of this section may be provided to the ap-
prentice or journeyworker or to  the child care provider that is providing child care services
for the apprentice or journeyworker.
(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
(b) The bureau may adopt rules to carry out this section.
(4) The bureau shall evaluate the impact of this section on increasing  diversity in the
construction workforce.
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 1
SECTION 3. CHIPS Child Care Fund. (1) The CHIPS Child Care Fund is established in  the
State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the CHIPS
Child Care Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the following purposes:
(a) Paying the  actual costs incurred by the department to develop and administer this
section and sections 1, 2 and 4 of this 2024 Act; and
(b) Carrying out  this section and sections 1, 2 and 4 of this 2024 Act, including trans-
ferring moneys to  the Bureau of Labor and Industries to develop and administer the program
described in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(3) The Oregon Business Development Department may transfer moneys deposited in the
fund to the Child Care Infrastructure Fund established  under ORS 329A.725. Moneys trans-
ferred under this subsection shall  be used by the department to provide financial assistance
under ORS  329A.727 for the purposes of increasing child care infrastructure in geographic
areas in this state where semiconductor or other advanced manufacturing  facilities are
presently located or scheduled to be constructed under sections 1 to 6, chapter 25,  Oregon
Laws 2023.
(4) The Oregon Business  Development Department shall administer the CHIPS Child Care
Fund in consultation with the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(5) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the Oregon Business Development Department;
(c) Moneys  transferred from the Oregon CHIPS Fund established in section 6, chapter
25, Oregon Laws 2023;
(d) Moneys  contributed to the CHIPS Child Care Fund by businesses that receive a pro-
gram grant or  loan under section 3, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, and federal semiconductor
financial assistance, as defined in section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023;
(e) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
(f) Moneys received from the federal or state government; and
(g) Moneys from any other public or private source.
SECTION 3a.
 Section 3 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The CHIPS Child Care Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the CHIPS  Child Care Fund shall be credited to
the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the following purposes:
(a) Paying the actual costs  incurred by the department to develop and administer this section
and [ sections 1, 2 and 4 ] section 2  of this 2024 Act; and
(b) Carrying out  this section and [ sections 1, 2 and 4 ] section 2  of this 2024 Act, including
transferring moneys to the Bureau of Labor and Industries to develop and administer the  program
described in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(3) The Oregon Business  Development Department may transfer moneys deposited in the fund
to the  Child Care Infrastructure Fund established under ORS 329A.725. Moneys transferred under
this subsection shall be used by the department to  provide financial assistance under ORS 329A.727
[for the purposes of increasing child care infrastructure in geographic areas in this state where  semi-
conductor or other advanced manufacturing  facilities are presently located or scheduled to be con-
structed under sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023 ].
(4) The Oregon Business Development Department shall administer the CHIPS  Child Care Fund
in consultation with the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(5) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the Oregon Business Development Department;
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 2
[(c) Moneys transferred  from the Oregon CHIPS Fund established in section 6, chapter 25, Oregon
Laws 2023;]
[(d)] (c)  Moneys contributed  to the [ CHIPS Child Care ] fund by businesses that receive a pro-
gram grant or loan under section 3, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2023, and federal semiconductor fi-
nancial assistance, as defined in section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023;
[(e)] (d) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
[(f)] (e)  Moneys received from the federal or state government; and
[(g)] (f)  Moneys from any other public or private source.
SECTION 4. Report. On or before November 15, 2024, the CHIPS Child Care  Work Group
established in section 1 of this 2024 Act  shall submit a report, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, on the recommendations  required by section 1 of this 2024 Act, to the committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to child care and workforce development.
SECTION 5.  Section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Oregon CHIPS  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct
from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon CHIPS Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred or credited to the fund by the Legislative
Assembly;
(b) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(c) Other moneys, or proceeds of property, from any public or private source  that are trans-
ferred, donated or otherwise credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in  the Oregon CHIPS Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business
Development Department for the following purposes:
(a) Paying  the actual costs incurred by the department in developing and administering sections
1 to 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ]; [ and]
(b) Carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023
Act]; and
(c) Transferring moneys  to the CHIPS Child Care Fund established under section 3 of this
2024 Act for purpose of carrying out section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(4) Moneys in the Oregon CHIPS  Fund on June 30, 2023, shall be retained in the fund, and used
for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section, until June 30, 2025.
(5) Any moneys remaining in the  Oregon CHIPS Fund on June 30, 2025, shall be transferred to
the General Fund.
SECTION 6.
Appropriation. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,
there is appropriated  to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, to  be deposited into
the CHIPS Child Care Fund established under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7. Expenditure limitation. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expendi-
tures, the limitation on expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 475, Oregon  Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $2,500,000, to implement  the provisions of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 8. Expenditure limitation. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expendi-
tures, the limitation on expenditures  established by section 2, chapter 471, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries,  is in-
creased by $681,662, to implement the provisions of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9. Expenditure limitation. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expendi-
tures, the  limitation on expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 448, Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 3
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds, corporate activity tax funds transferred from the Early Learning Account by the  De-
partment of Education and federal funds, collected or  received by the Department of Early
Learning and Care, for operations, is increased by $366,245, to implement the provisions  of
this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10. Operative date. The amendments to section 3  of this 2024 Act by section
3a of this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2033.
SECTION 11. Sunset. Sections 1 and 4 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 12. Captions disclaimer. The section captions used  in this 2024 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13. Effective date. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2024
Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4098 (HB 4098-B) Page 4